Arkansas, session 2025, SB351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-6-203(a)(1), concerning a candidate's
acceptance of campaign contributions and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of
1996, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(C) It shall be unlawful for a prospective contributor
other than those under subdivisions (a)(1)(A)(i)-(vi) of this section to make
a contribution to:
(i) A candidate for public office; or
(ii) A person acting on the candidate’s behalf.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-6-203(f)(4)(A)(iii), concerning a
candidate's acceptance of campaign funds as personal income and resulting
from Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(iii) If a candidate or officeholder is assessed a
fine by the Arkansas Ethics Commission under § 7-6-218(b)(4)(B) for the use
*SSS184*
03-05-2025 14:47:50 SSS184

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB351
of campaign funds as personal income, a candidate or officeholder shall not
use campaign funds or carryover remaining campaign funds to pay the fine.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-6-203(g)(2)(E), concerning a candidate's
acceptance of campaign funds as personal income and resulting from Initiated
Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(E) If a candidate or officeholder uses campaign funds or
carryover remaining campaign funds to pay a fine imposed by the Arkansas
Ethics Commission under § 7-6-218(b)(4)(B) for the use of campaign funds as
personal income, the candidate or officeholder shall be deemed to have taken
campaign funds as personal income.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-6-206(a), concerning records of
contributions and expenditures for campaign finance, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) A candidate, a political party, or a person acting in the
candidate's behalf, a political party, a county political party committee, a
political action committee, an independent expenditure committee, or a person
making independent expenditures shall keep records of all contributions and
expenditures in a manner sufficient to evidence compliance with §§ 7-6-207 —
7-6-210 § 7-6-201 et seq.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 7-6-207(a)(1)(F), concerning records of
contributions and expenditures for campaign finance and resulting from
Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(F)(i) If a candidate keeps remaining campaign funds after
an election, but does not have any activity before the end of the year, the
candidate shall not be required to file a fourth quarter report.
(ii) If a candidate keeps remaining campaign funds
and or raises campaign funds for a future campaign, or expends campaign funds
for office holder expenses or a future election, the candidate shall continue
filing the reports required by this subsection.
(iii) If a candidate keeps remaining campaign funds
after an election, the candidate shall continue filing the reports required
by this subsection.

03-05-2025 14:47:50 SSS184

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB351
SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 7-6-207(b)(2)(B), concerning records of
contributions and expenditures for campaign finance and resulting from
Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(B) If a candidate's campaign has ended and the candidate
is retaining remaining campaign funds, the final report shall also indicate
the amount of funds retained by the candidate in accordance with § 7-6-201(3)
[repealed] as remaining campaign funds.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 7-6-208(b)(2)(A), concerning reports of
contributions for candidates for school district, township, or municipal
office and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) When the candidate's campaign has ended, the final report
shall also indicate which option under § 7-6-203(g) was used to dispose of
any surplus of campaign funds, the amount of funds disposed of by the
candidate, and the amount of funds retained by the candidate in accordance
with § 7-6-201(3) [repealed] as remaining campaign funds.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 7-6-209(b)(2)(A), concerning reports of
contributions for candidates for county offices and resulting from Initiated
Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) When the candidate's campaign has ended, the final report
shall also indicate which option under § 7-6-203(g) was used to dispose of
any surplus of campaign funds, the amount of funds disposed of by the
candidate, and the amount of funds retained by the candidate in accordance
with § 7-6-201(3) [repealed] as remaining campaign funds.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 7-6-215(d)(6), concerning registration and
reporting by approved political action committees and resulting from
Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is amended to read as follows:
(6)(A) A political action committee shall indicate on its
quarterly report for the fourth quarter of each calendar year whether or not
it intends to terminate its registration for the next calendar year.
(B) If a quarterly report for the fourth quarter is filed
in paper form, the form utilized by the Secretary of State for filing shall
require the political action committee to indicate whether or not it intends
03-05-2025 14:47:50 SSS184

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB351
to terminate its registration for the next calendar year.
(C) If the Secretary of State offers electronic filing of
political action committee reports, the format used by the Secretary of State
for the filing of political action committee reports in electronic form shall
require a political action committee indicating that it intends to terminate
its registration for the next calendar year to terminate its registration for
the next calendar year before submitting its quarterly report for the fourth
quarter.
(D)(B) If a political action committee does not file any
quarterly reports for a period of two (2) years, the Secretary of State shall
terminate the political action committee's registration due to inactivity.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 7-6-216(c), concerning registration and
reports by exploratory committees and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1990,
is amended to read as follows:
(c) Within thirty (30) days of the end of each month, No later than
twenty (20) days after the end of each month, an exploratory committee shall
file a report with the appropriate filing office indicating:
(1) The total amount of contributions received during the filing
period;
(2) The name and address of each person who has made a
contribution which, in the aggregate, exceeds two hundred dollars ($200),
along with the contributor's principal place of business, employer,
occupation, and the amount contributed; and
(3) The total amount of expenditures made and, for each single
expenditure that exceeds one hundred dollars ($100), an itemization,
including the amount of the expenditure, the name and address of the person
to whom the expenditure was made, and the date the expenditure was made.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 7-6-220(a)(1)(B), concerning the report of
independent expenditures and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1996, is
amended to read as follows:
(B) Each subsequent report shall be filed no later than
fifteen (15) twenty (20) days after the end of each month until the election
is held, except as required in subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section.

03-05-2025 14:47:50 SSS184

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB351
SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 7-6-227(a)(1)(A), concerning registration
by an independent expenditure committee, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) An independent expenditure committee shall register with the
Secretary of State within fifteen (15) days after accepting contributions or
making independent expenditures that exceed five hundred dollars ($500) two
hundred dollars ($200) in the aggregate during a calendar year.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 7-6-228(c)(2), concerning campaign signs
and campaign materials, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section applies only to
campaign signs, campaign literature, and other printed campaign materials
created by or sponsored by a political candidate, the campaign of a political
candidate, a political action committee, or an independent expenditure
committee, or persons making independent expenditures.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 7-9-402(2)(B), concerning the definition
of "ballot question committee" as it relates to matters referred to voters,
is amended to read as follows:
(B) A person other than an individual or an approved
political action committee as defined in § 7-6-201, located within or outside
Arkansas, also qualifies as a ballot question committee if an amount equal to
two percent (2%) or more of its annual revenues, operating expenses, or funds
are for the most recently completed year is used to make a contribution or
contributions to another ballot question committee and if the contribution or
contributions exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in value;

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 7-9-402(10)(B), concerning the definition
of "legislative question committee" as it relates to matters referred to
voters, is amended to read as follows:
(B) A person other than an individual or an approved
political action committee as defined in § 7-6-201, located within or outside
Arkansas, also qualifies as a legislative question committee if an amount
equal to two percent (2%) or more of its annual revenues, operating expenses,
or funds are for the most recently completed year is used to make a
contribution or contributions to another legislative question committee and
if the contribution or contributions exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in
03-05-2025 14:47:50 SSS184

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB351
value;

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 7-9-409(a)(3), concerning time for filing
financial reports for matters referred to voters, is amended to read as
follows:
(3)(A) Furthermore, a A final financial report shall be filed no
later than thirty (30) days after the election.
(B) If a ballot question fails to qualify for the ballot
or is disqualified, the final financial report required under subdivision
(a)(3)(A) of this section shall be filed no later than thirty (30) days after
the end of the month in which the ballot question fails to qualify for the
ballot or is disqualified.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code Title 7, Chapter 9, Subchapter 4, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
7-9-416. Contributions and expenditures for campaign signs, campaign
literature, and printed campaign materials.
(a) A ballot question committee, a legislative question committee, an
individual person, or an elected official who receives contributions or makes
expenditures to support or oppose a ballot question or legislative question:
(1) May reuse the campaign signs, campaign literature, and other
printed campaign materials in future initiative campaigns that have been
properly reported in a previous campaign by that committee, individual
person, or elected official; and
(2) Is not required to list the campaign signs, campaign
literature, and other printed campaign materials under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section in future reports filed under this subchapter.
(b)(1) Campaign signs, campaign literature, and other printed campaign
materials under subsection (a) of this section shall clearly contain the
words “Paid for by” followed by the name of the committee, individual person,
or elected official who paid for the campaign sign, campaign literature, or
other printed campaign materials.
(2) The ballot question committee, legislative question
committee, individual person, or elected official printing the campaign sign,
campaign literature, or other printed campaign materials shall be responsible
for including the language required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
03-05-2025 14:47:50 SSS184

As Engrossed: S3/5/25 SB351

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 21-8-703(a), concerning the place and
manner for filing a statement of financial interest, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(7) Executive directors of education service cooperatives
required to file shall file with the county clerk.

/s/J. Dismang




























03-05-2025 14:47:50 SSS184